California statutes. Penal Code
(a) “Witness” means any person who has been summoned, or is reasonably expected to be summoned, to testify in a criminal matter, including grand jury proceedings, for the people whether or not formal legal proceedings have been filed. Active or passive participation in the criminal matter does not disqualify an individual from being a witness. “Witness” may also apply to family, friends, or associates of the witness who are deemed by local or state prosecutors to be endangered.

(b) “Credible evidence” means evidence leading a reasonable person to believe that substantial reliability should be attached to the evidence.

(c) “Protection” means formal admission into a witness protection program established by this title memorialized by a written agreement between local or state prosecutors and the witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 210, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.

The program shall be administered by the Attorney General. In any criminal proceeding within this state, when the action is brought by local or state prosecutors, where credible evidence exists of a substantial danger that a witness may suffer intimidation or retaliatory violence, the Attorney General may reimburse state and local agencies for the costs of providing witness protection services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 210, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.

The Attorney General shall give priority to matters involving organized crime, gang activities, drug trafficking, human trafficking, and cases involving a high degree of risk to the witness. Special regard shall also be given to the elderly, the young, battered, victims of domestic violence, the infirm, the handicapped, and victims of hate incidents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 240, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14024.

The Attorney General shall coordinate the efforts of state and local agencies to secure witness protection, relocation, and assistance services and then reimburse those state and local agencies for the costs of the services that he or she determines to be necessary to protect a witness from bodily injury, assure the witness’s safe transition into a new environment, and otherwise to assure the health, safety, and welfare of the witness. The Attorney General may reimburse the state or local agencies that provide witnesses with any of the following:

(a) Armed protection or escort by law enforcement officials or security personnel before, during, or subsequent to, legal proceedings.

(b) Physical relocation to an alternate residence.

(c) Housing expense.

(d) Appropriate documents to establish a new identity.

(e) Transportation or storage of personal possessions.

(f) Basic living expenses, including, but not limited to, food, transportation, utility costs, and health care.

(g) Support, advocacy, and other services to provide for witnesses’ safe transition into a new environment.

(h) Other services as needed and approved by the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14025.

The witness protection agreement shall be in writing, and shall specify the responsibilities of the protected person that establish the conditions for local or state prosecutors providing protection. The protected person shall agree to all of the following:

(a) If a witness or potential witness, to testify in and provide information to all appropriate law enforcement officials concerning all appropriate proceedings.

(b) To refrain from committing any crime.

(c) To take all necessary steps to avoid detection by others of the facts concerning the protection provided to that person under this title.

(d) To comply with legal obligations and civil judgments against that person.

(e) To cooperate with all reasonable requests of officers and employees of this state who are providing protection under this title.

(f) To designate another person to act as agent for the service of process.

(g) To make a sworn statement of all outstanding legal obligations, including obligations concerning child custody and visitation.

(h) To disclose any probation or parole responsibilities, and if the person is on probation or parole.

(i) To regularly inform the appropriate program official of his or her activities and current address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 210, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14025.5.

The State of California, the counties and cities within the state, and their respective officers and employees shall not be liable for any condition in the witness protection agreement that cannot reasonably be met due to a witness committing a crime during participation in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 210, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.

Funds available to implement this title may be used for any of the following:

(a) To protect witnesses where credible evidence exists that they may be in substantial danger of intimidation or retaliatory violence because of their testimony.

(b) To provide temporary and permanent relocation of witnesses and provide for their transition and well-being into a safe and secure environment.

(c) To pay the costs of administering the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.5.

For the purposes of this title, notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a witness, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14021, selected by local or state prosecutors to receive services under the program established pursuant to this title because he or she has been or may be victimized due to the testimony he or she will give, shall be deemed a victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 210, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14027.

The Attorney General shall issue appropriate guidelines and may adopt regulations to implement this title. These guidelines shall include:

(a) A process whereby state and local agencies shall apply for reimbursement of the costs of providing witness protection services.

(b) A 25-percent match that shall be required of local agencies. The Attorney General may also establish a process through which to waive the required local match when appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 65.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14028.

The State of California, the counties and cities within the state, and their respective officers and employees shall have immunity from civil liability for any decision declining or revoking protection to a witness under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.

All information relating to any witness participating in the program established pursuant to this title shall remain confidential and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and, if a change of name has been approved by the program, the order to show cause is not subject to the publication requirement of Section 1277 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 351.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.5.

(a) (1) No person or private entity shall post on the Internet the home address, the telephone number, or personal identifying information that discloses the location of any witness or witness’ family member participating in the Witness Relocation and Assistance Program (WRAP) with the intent that another person imminently use that information to commit a crime involving violence or a threat of violence against that witness or witness’ family member.

(2) A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or imprisonment of up to six months in a county jail, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(3) A violation of this subdivision that leads to the bodily injury of the witness, or of any of the witness’ family members who are participating in the program, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment of up to one year in a county jail, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Upon admission to WRAP, local or state prosecutors shall give each participant a written opt-out form for submission to relevant Internet search engine companies or entities. This form shall notify entities of the protected person and prevent the inclusion of the participant’s addresses and telephone numbers in public Internet search databases.

(c) A business, state or local agency, private entity, or person that receives the opt-out form of a WRAP participant pursuant to this section
 shall remove the participant’s personal information from public display on the Internet within two business days of delivery of the opt-out form, and shall continue to ensure that this information is not reposted on the same Internet Web site, a subsidiary site, or any other Internet Web site maintained by the recipient of the opt-out form. No business, state or local agency, private entity, or person that has received an opt-out form from a WRAP participant shall solicit, sell, or trade on the Internet the home address or telephone number of that participant.

(d) A business, state or local agency, private entity, or person that violates subdivision (c) shall be subject to a civil penalty for each violation in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000). An action for a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California and the penalty imposed shall be enforceable
 as a civil judgment.

(e) A witness whose home address or telephone number is made public as a result of a violation of subdivision (c) may bring an action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. If a jury or court finds that a violation has occurred, it may grant injunctive or declaratory relief and shall award the witness court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a witness whose home address or telephone number is solicited, sold, or traded in violation of subdivision (c) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction. If a jury or court finds that a violation has occurred, it shall award damages to that witness in an amount up to a maximum of three times the actual damages, but in no case less than four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(g) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 183.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14030.

(a) The Attorney General shall establish a liaison with the United States Marshal’s office in order to facilitate the legal processes over which the federal government has sole authority, including, but not limited to, those processes included in Section 14024. The liaison shall coordinate all requests for federal assistance relating to witness protection as established by this title.

(b) The Attorney General shall pursue all federal sources that may be available for implementing this program. For that purpose, the Attorney General shall establish a liaison with the United States Department of Justice.

(c) The Attorney
 General, with the California Victim Compensation Board, shall establish procedures to maximize federal funds for witness protection services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 259.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14031.

Commencing one year after the effective date of this title, the Attorney General shall make an annual report to the Legislature no later than January 1 on the fiscal and operational status of the program. This report shall include the amount of funding sought by each county, the amount of funding provided to each county, and the amount of the county match.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 66.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14032.

The administrative costs of the Attorney General for the purposes of administering this title shall be limited to 5 percent of all costs incurred pursuant to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14033.

(a) The Governor’s budget shall specify the estimated amount in the Restitution Fund that is in excess of the amount needed to pay claims pursuant to Sections 13960 to 13965, inclusive, of the Government Code, to pay administrative costs for increasing restitution funds, and to maintain a prudent reserve.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, notwithstanding Government Code Section 13967, in the annual Budget Act, funds be appropriated to the Attorney General from those funds that are in excess of the amount specified pursuant to subdivision (a) for the purposes of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 8. BUILDING SECURITY [14051. - 14051.]

14051.

The chief law enforcement and fire officials of every city shall consult with the chief officer of their city who is charged with the enforcement of laws or ordinances regulating the erection, construction, or alteration of buildings within their jurisdiction for the purpose of developing local security standards and regulations supplemental to those adopted as part of Title 24 of the California Administrative Code, relating to building standards. The chief law enforcement and fire officials of every county shall consult with the chief officer of their county who is charged with the enforcement of laws or ordinances regulating the erection, construction, or alteration of buildings within their jurisdiction for the purpose of developing local security standards and regulations supplemental to those adopted as part of Title 24 of the California Administrative Code, relating to building standards. No provision of this or any other code shall prevent a city or county from enacting building security standards stricter than those enacted by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1662.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10. COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION AND CONFLICT RESOLUTION [14110. - 14121.]

14110.

The Legislature finds the following:

(a) The incidence of violence in our state continues to present an increasing and dominating societal problem that must be addressed at its root causes in order to reduce significantly its effects upon our society.

(b) As an initial step toward that goal, the Legislature passed Assembly Bill No. 23 of the 1979–80 Regular Session which created the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention which was charged with compiling the latest research on root causes of violence, in order to lay the foundation for a credible, effective violence eradication program.

(c) The commission produced a final report in 1982 entitled “Ounces of Prevention,” which established that long-term prevention is a valuable and viable public policy and demonstrated that there are reachable root causes of violence in our society.

(d) The report contains comprehensive findings and recommendations in 10 broad categorical areas for the removal of individual, familial, and societal causal factors of crime and violence in California.

(e) The recommendations in the report are feasible and credible, propose an effective means of resolving conflict and removing the root causes of violence in our society, and should be implemented, so that their value may be provided to our citizenry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1709, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14111.

The Legislature further finds that:

(a) It is in the public interest to translate the findings of the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention into community-empowering, community-activated violence prevention efforts that would educate, inspire, and inform the citizens of California about, coordinate existing programs relating to, and provide direct services addressing the root causes of, violence in California.

(b) The recommendations in the report of the commission can serve as both the foundation and guidelines for short-, intermediate-, and long-term programs to address and alleviate violence in California.

(c) It is in the public interest to facilitate the highest degree of coordination between, cooperation among, and utilization of public, nonprofit, and private sector resources, programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions toward maximally successful violence prevention and crime control efforts.

(d) Prevention is a sound fiscal, as well as social, policy objective. Crime and violence prevention programs can and should yield substantially beneficial results with regard to the exorbitant costs of both violence and crime to the public and private sectors.

(e) The Office of Emergency Services is the appropriate state agency to contract for programs addressing the root causes of violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 464.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14112.

The Legislature therefore intends:

(a) To develop community violence prevention and conflict resolution programs, in the state, based upon the recommendations of the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention, that would present a balanced, comprehensive educational, intellectual, and experiential approach toward eradicating violence in our society.

(b) That these programs shall be regulated, and funded pursuant to contracts with the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 465.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14113.

Unless otherwise required by context, as used in this title:

(a) “Agency” or “office” means the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) “Secretary” or “director” means the Director of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 466.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14114.

(a) First priority shall be given to programs that provide community education, outreach, and coordination, and include creative and effective ways to translate the recommendations of the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention into practical use in one or more of the following subject areas:

(1) Parenting, birthing, early childhood development, self-esteem, and family violence, to include child, spousal, and elderly abuse.

(2) Economic factors and institutional racism.

(3) Schools and educational factors.

(4) Alcohol, diet, drugs, and other biochemical and biological factors.

(5) Conflict resolution.

(6) The media.

(b) At least three of the programs shall do all of the following:

(1) Use the recommendations of the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention and incorporate as many of those recommendations as possible into its program.

(2) Develop an intensive community-level educational program directed toward violence prevention. This educational component shall incorporate the commission’s works “Ounces of Prevention” and “Taking Root,” and shall be designed appropriately to reach the educational, ethnic, and socioeconomic individuals, groups, agencies, and institutions in the community.

(3) Include the imparting of conflict resolution skills.

(4) Coordinate with existing community-based, public and private, programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions, local, regional, and statewide public educational systems, criminal and juvenile justice systems, mental and public health agencies, appropriate human service agencies, and churches and religious organizations.

(5) Seek to provide specific resource and referral services to individuals, programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions confronting problems with violence and crime if the service is not otherwise available to the public.

(6) Reach all local ethnic, cultural, linguistic, and socioeconomic groups in the service area to the maximum extent feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 115, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14114.5.

Other programs shall include subdivisions (a) and (f) of Section 14114 and may include public lectures or sponsoring of conferences, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1709, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.

(a) First priority programs may additionally provide specific direct services or contract for those services in one or more of the program areas as necessary to carry out the recommendations of the commission when those services are not otherwise available in the community and existing agencies do not furnish them. Direct services may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Training seminars for law enforcement and human service agencies and operatives.

(2) Crisis intervention training and counseling.

(3) Casework and program consultation with local human service providers.

(4) Drug and alcohol counseling and treatment referral.

(5) Conflict resolution training and services, including the principles and practices of conflict mediation, arbitration, and “citizen tribunal” programs. 

(b) All direct services are subject to Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1709, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14116.

Second priority shall be given to programs that conform to the requirements of Section 14114, except that the educational component of subdivision (f) of that section shall not be mandatory in each subject area, but shall be provided in at least three of those areas, and the programs shall provide specific direct services or contract for services in one or more program areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1709, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14117.

(a) Each program shall have a governing board or an interagency coordinating team, or both, of at least nine members representing a cross section of existing and recipient, community-based, public and private persons, programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions. Each team shall do all of the following:

(1) As closely as possible represent the socioeconomic, ethnic, linguistic, and cultural makeup of the community and shall evidence an interest in and commitment to the categorical areas of violence prevention and conflict resolution.

(2) Be responsible for the implementation, evaluation, and operation of the program
 and all its constituent elements, including those specific direct services as may be provided pursuant to Section 14115.

(3) Be accountable for the distribution of all funds.

(4) Designate and appoint a responsible administrative authority acceptable to the Office of Emergency Services prior to the receipt of a grant.

(5) Submit an annual report to the Office of Emergency Services, which shall include information on all of the following:

(A) The number of learning events.

(B) The number of persons trained.

(C) An overview of the changing
 level of information regarding root causes of violence.

(D) An overview of the changing level of attitude regarding root causes of violence.

(E) The changing level of behavior regarding root causes of violence.

(F) The degree to which the program has been successful in satisfying the requirements set forth in subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 14114.

(G) Other measures of program efficacy as specified by the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) Coordinating teams established under this section may adopt local policies, procedures, and bylaws consistent with this
 title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 467.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14118.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall prepare and issue written program, fiscal, and administrative guidelines for the contracted programs that are consistent with this title, including guidelines for identifying recipient programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions, and organizing the coordinating teams. The Office of Emergency Services shall then issue a request for proposals. The responses to the request for proposals shall be rated according to the priorities set forth in subdivision (b) and additional criteria established by the guidelines. The highest rated responses shall be selected. The Office of Emergency Services shall do all of the following:

(1) Subject
 the proposed program and administrative guidelines to a 30-day period of broad public evaluation with public hearings commencing in May 1985, prior to adoption, including specific solicitation of input from culturally, geographically, socioeconomically, educationally, and ethnically diverse persons, programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions.

(2) Provide adequate public notice of the public evaluation around the state in major metropolitan and rural newspapers and related media outlets, and to local public, private, and nonprofit human service executives and advisory boards, and other appropriate persons and organizations.

(3) Establish a mechanism for obtaining, evaluating, and incorporating when appropriate and feasible, public input regarding the written program and
 administrative guidelines prior to adoption.

(b) Applicants for contracts under this title may be existing community-based public and nonprofit programs, agencies, organizations, and institutions, newly developed nonprofit corporations, or joint proposals from combinations of either or both of the above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 468.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14119.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall promote, organize, and conduct a series of one-day crime and violence prevention training workshops around the state. The Office of Emergency Services shall seek participation in the workshops from ethnically, linguistically, culturally, educationally, and economically diverse persons, agencies, organizations, and institutions.

(b) The training workshops shall have all of the following goals:

(1) To identify phenomena which are thought to be root causes of crime and violence.

(2) To identify local manifestations
 of those root causes.

(3) To examine the findings and recommendations of the California Commission on Crime Control and Violence Prevention.

(4) To focus on team building and interagency cooperation and coordination toward addressing the local problems of crime and violence.

(5) To examine the merits and necessity of a local crime and violence prevention effort.

(c) There shall be at least three workshops.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 469.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14120.

(a) Programs shall be funded, depending upon the availability of funds, for a period of two years.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall provide 50 percent of the program costs, to a maximum amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per program per year. The recipient shall provide the remaining 50 percent with other resources which may include in-kind contributions and services. The administrative expenses for the pilot programs funded under Section 14120 shall not exceed 10 percent.

(c) Programs should be seeking private sector moneys and developing ways to become self-sufficient upon completion of pilot
 program funding.

(d) The recipient programs shall be responsible for a yearend independent audit.

(e) The Office of Emergency Services shall do an interim evaluation of the programs, commencing in July 1986, and shall report to the Legislature and the people with the results of the evaluation prior to October 31, 1986. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment and inventory of all of the following:

(1) The number of learning events.

(2) The number of persons trained.

(3) The changing level of information regarding root causes of violence.

(4) The changing level of attitude regarding root causes of violence.

(5) The changing level of behavior regarding root causes of violence.

(6) The reduced level of violence in our society.

(7) The degree to which the program has succeeded in reaching and impacting positively upon local ethnic, cultural, and socioeconomic groups in the service area.

A final evaluation shall be made with a report prior to October 31, 1987, which shall also include specific recommendations to the Legislature and the people of this state regarding methods and means by which these violence prevention and crime control programmatic
 efforts can be enhanced and improved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 470.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14121.

The Office of Emergency Services may hire support staff and utilize resources necessary to carry out the purposes of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 471.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10.2. California Violence Intervention and Prevention Grant Program [14130. - 14131.]

14130.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Break the Cycle of Violence Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   (AB 1603)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14131.

(a) The California Violence Intervention and Prevention Grant Program (CalVIP) is hereby created to be administered by the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) The purpose of CalVIP is to improve public health and safety by supporting effective community gun violence reduction initiatives in communities that are disproportionately impacted by community gun violence. For purposes of this section, “community gun violence” means intentional acts of interpersonal violence involving a firearm, generally committed in public areas by individuals who are not intimately related to the victim, and which result in physical injury, emotional harm, or death.

(c) CalVIP grants shall be used to develop, support, expand, and replicate evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiatives, including, without limitation, hospital-based violence intervention programs, evidence-based street outreach programs, and focused deterrence strategies, that seek to interrupt cycles of community gun violence and retaliation in order to reduce the incidence of homicides, shootings, and aggravated assaults. These initiatives shall be primarily focused on providing violence intervention services to the small segment of the population that is identified as high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.

(d) CalVIP grants shall be made on a competitive basis to cities that are disproportionately impacted by
 community gun violence,
 to community-based organizations that serve the residents of those cities, and to counties that have one or more cities disproportionately impacted by community gun violence within their jurisdiction. For purposes of this section, “cities” includes tribal governments.

(e) For purposes of this section, a city is disproportionately impacted by community gun violence if any of the following are true:

(1) The city experienced 20 or more homicides per calendar year during two or more of the three calendar years immediately preceding the grant application for which the Department of Justice has available data.

(2) The city experienced 10 or more homicides per calendar year and had a homicide rate that
 was at least 50 percent higher than the statewide homicide rate during two or more of the three calendar years immediately preceding the grant application for which the Department of Justice has available data.

(3) An applicant otherwise demonstrates a unique and compelling need for additional resources to address the impact of community gun violence in the applicant’s community. Recognizing the historical challenges that California tribes have faced in gathering formal data on violent crime, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall take input from tribal governments on how to determine “compelling need,” in the context of tribal governments.

(f) An applicant for a CalVIP grant shall submit a proposal,
 in a form prescribed by the board, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Clearly defined and measurable objectives for the grant.

(2) A statement describing how the applicant proposes to use the grant to implement an evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiative in accordance with this section, including how the applicant will identify, engage, and provide violence intervention services to individuals at high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.

(3) A statement describing how the applicant proposes to use the grant to enhance coordination of existing community gun violence prevention and intervention programs and
 minimize duplication of services in the proposed service area. Where relevant, this shall include a description of efforts to coordinate with tribal governments located near or within the planned service delivery area.

(4) Evidence indicating that the proposed violence reduction initiative would likely reduce the incidence of community gun violence in the
 proposed service area within the grant period.

(5) For city or county applicants, a statement demonstrating support for the proposed violence reduction initiative from one or more community-based organizations, or from a public agency or department other than a law enforcement agency that is primarily dedicated to community safety or violence prevention.

(g) In awarding CalVIP grants, the board shall give preference to applicants whose grant proposals demonstrate the greatest likelihood of reducing the incidence of
 community gun violence in the applicant’s community within the grant period without contributing to mass incarceration.

(h) The amount of funds awarded to an applicant shall be commensurate with the scope of the applicant’s proposal and the applicant’s demonstrated need for additional resources to address
 community gun violence in the applicant’s community.

(1) The Board of State and Community Corrections may award competitive grants in amounts not to exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) per applicant per year. The length of the grant cycle shall be at least three years.

(2) The board shall award at least two grants to cities or counties with populations of 200,000 or less.

(i) Upon making CalVIP grant awards, the board shall make at least 20 percent of an approved grantee’s total grant award available to the grantee at the start of the grant period or as soon as possible thereafter, in order to enable grantees to immediately utilize such funds to support violence reduction
 initiatives.

(j) Each city or county that receives a CalVIP grant shall distribute no less than 50 percent of the grant funds to one or more of any of the following types of entities:

(1) Community-based organizations.

(2) Public agencies or departments, other than law enforcement agencies or departments, that are primarily dedicated to community safety or violence prevention.

(3) Tribal governments.

(k) The board shall form an executive steering committee including, without limitation, persons who have been impacted
 by community gun violence, formerly incarcerated persons, subject matter experts in community gun violence prevention and intervention, the director of the Office of Gun Violence Prevention or the director’s designee, and at least three persons with direct experience in implementing evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiatives, including initiatives that incorporate public health and community-based approaches focused on providing violence intervention services to the small segment of the population identified as high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.

(l) (1) The board may reserve up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) of the funds appropriated for CalVIP each year for the costs of administering and promoting the effectiveness of the program
 including, without limitation, the employment of personnel, providing technical assistance to grantees, coordinating with other state and local agencies on community gun violence reduction efforts, and evaluation of violence reduction initiatives supported by CalVIP.

(2) The board may, with the advice and assistance of the CalVIP executive steering committee, reserve up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for CalVIP each year for the purpose of supporting programs and activities designed to build and sustain capacity in the field of community gun violence intervention and prevention, and to support detailed community gun violence problem analyses that help service providers and other stakeholders inform and develop community gun violence reduction initiatives by identifying individuals in their community who are at high risk of
 perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future and have the highest need for violence intervention services. Activities to build and sustain capacity in the field of community-based gun violence intervention and prevention may include any of the following:

(A) Contracting with or providing grants to organizations that provide training, certification, or continued professional development to community-based gun violence intervention and prevention professionals, including frontline professionals and technical assistance providers.

(B) Contracting with or providing grants to nonprofit intermediary organizations that foster the development and growth of community-based organizations dedicated to community gun violence intervention and
 prevention.

(C) Providing mental health support and other supportive services to frontline community gun violence intervention professionals in order to recruit, retain, and sustain these professionals in their field.

(D) Providing mental health services or financial assistance to family members of frontline community gun violence intervention professionals who are killed or violently injured in the performance of their work.
